Maine, session 132, LD742.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §69, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §69, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §566, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §567, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §2, is repealed and
the following enacted in its place:
§567. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
Page 1 - 132LR0379(01)

A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §1533, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §1533, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §2266, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Page 2 - 132LR0379(01)

Sec. 8. 32 MRSA §2267, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §4, is repealed and
the following enacted in its place:
§2267. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 9. 32 MRSA §2276-A, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 10. 32 MRSA §2276-A, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
Page 3 - 132LR0379(01)

D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 11. 32 MRSA §2600-AA, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 12. 32 MRSA §2600-BB, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §7, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§2600-BB. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 13. 32 MRSA §3120, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 14. 32 MRSA §3120, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
Page 4 - 132LR0379(01)

2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 15. 32 MRSA §3300-AA, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 16. 32 MRSA §3300-BB, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §9, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§3300-BB. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
Page 5 - 132LR0379(01)

D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 17. 32 MRSA §3661, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 18. 32 MRSA §3662, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §10, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§3662. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 19. 32 MRSA §3850-E, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Page 6 - 132LR0379(01)

Sec. 20. 32 MRSA §3850-F, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §11 and
reallocated by RR 2021, c. 1, Pt. A, §29, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
§3850-F. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 21. 32 MRSA §4879, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 22. 32 MRSA §4879, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
Page 7 - 132LR0379(01)

D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 23. 32 MRSA §6231, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 24. 32 MRSA §6232, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §13, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§6232. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 25. 32 MRSA §7071, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Page 8 - 132LR0379(01)

Sec. 26. 32 MRSA §7072, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §14, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§7072. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 27. 32 MRSA §9714, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 28. 32 MRSA §9714, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
Page 9 - 132LR0379(01)

D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 29. 32 MRSA §9863, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 30. 32 MRSA §9863, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 31. 32 MRSA §9916, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 32. 32 MRSA §9916, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
Page 10 - 132LR0379(01)

A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 33. 32 MRSA §12611, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 34. 32 MRSA §12612, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §18, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§12612. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Page 11 - 132LR0379(01)

Sec. 35. 32 MRSA §13848, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 36. 32 MRSA §13849, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §19, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§13849. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 37. 32 MRSA §13868, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 38. 32 MRSA §13868, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
Page 12 - 132LR0379(01)

A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 39. 32 MRSA §14363, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed under chapter 46 or 48,
advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section 2201-A or physician
assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides preventive care
services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to health care
services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 40. 32 MRSA §14363, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not
licensed in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision
of law to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth
services to a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 41. 32 MRSA §17401, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Page 13 - 132LR0379(01)

Sec. 42. 32 MRSA §17402, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 291, Pt. B, §22, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§17402. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.
Sec. 43. 32 MRSA §19601, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Primary care provider. "Primary care provider" means a physician licensed
under chapter 46 or 48, advanced practice registered nurse approved pursuant to section
2201-A or physician assistant licensed under section 2594-E or 3270-E who provides
preventive care services to a patient and coordinates and oversees a patient's access to
health care services, including specialty health care services.
Sec. 44. 32 MRSA §19602, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 580, §8, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
§19602. Telehealth services permitted
1. Persons licensed in this State; telehealth services permitted. A person licensed
under this chapter may provide telehealth services as long as the licensee acts within the
scope of practice of the licensee's license, in accordance with any requirements and
restrictions imposed by this subchapter and in accordance with standards of practice.
2. Telehealth services upon referral of primary care provider; person not licensed
in this State. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other provision of law
to the contrary, a person not licensed under this chapter may provide telehealth services to
a patient located in this State if:
Page 14 - 132LR0379(01)

A. The patient has received a referral from a primary care provider licensed in this
State and the primary care provider has obtained and documented the patient's written
informed consent to receive telehealth services;
B. The person is fully licensed without restriction in the state from which the person
provides telehealth services, including any licensing or certification requirements to
provide telehealth services in that state;
C. The person has not had a license revoked or restricted in any state or jurisdiction;
D. The person complies with the provisions of this section regarding telehealth
services and any rules adopted pursuant to this section in the same manner as a person
licensed under this chapter; and
E. Prior to the provision of telehealth services, the person discloses to the patient the
person's qualifications, proof of licensure and contact information.